Hawaii, session 2026, HB2571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 230, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, converted one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent grant writer position within the department of agriculture and biosecurity to a temporary position.  The legislature believes that this grant writer position is necessary to reduce reliance on temporary or ad hoc contracting and improve long-term grant competitiveness, and therefore, the position should remain permanent. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the existing temporary grant writer position within the department of agriculture and biosecurity and to make the position permanent. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to fund one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) grant writer position within the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the identification of, application for, and management of federal and private grants in support of agriculture, biosecurity, food security, and climate resiliency programs, to reduce reliance on ad hoc contracting and improve long-term grant competitiveness; provided that the amount appropriated and position funded pursuant to this section shall be included in the base budget for the department of agriculture and biosecurity in future fiscal bienniums. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________